Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 2

Government Taking of Private Property

12-1-201. Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to provide a mechanism for education of, and consideration by, state agencies and the public regarding what government actions may result in an unconstitutional taking of private property, in order to avoid an unnecessary burden on the public treasury and unwarranted interference with private property rights. It is not the purpose of this part either to enlarge or to reduce the scope of private property protections afforded by the constitution of the United States or Tennessee.

Acts 1994, ch. 924, § 2.

12-1-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Government action” does not include:

The formal exercise of the power of eminent domain;

The forfeiture or seizure of private property by law enforcement agencies as evidence of a crime or for violations of law;

Orders issued by a state agency or court of law that result from a violation of law and that are authorized by statute; or

The discontinuation of government programs;

“Private property” means real property, or improvements to real property, not owned by the federal government or a state agency; and

“Unconstitutional taking” or “taking” means the taking of private property by government action such that compensation to the owner of that property is required by either:

The fifth or fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States; or

The Constitution of Tennessee, Art. 1, § 21.

Acts 1994, ch. 924, § 3.

12-1-203. Guidelines for avoiding unconstitutional takings.

The attorney general and reporter shall develop and submit to the secretary of state for publication in the Tennessee administrative register guidelines to assist in the identification and evaluation of government actions that may result in unconstitutional taking. The attorney general and reporter shall base the guidelines on current law as articulated by the United States supreme court and the supreme court of Tennessee, and shall update the guidelines at least on an annual basis to take account of changes in the law. Nothing in the guidelines shall be construed either to enlarge or to reduce the scope of private property protection afforded by the constitution of the United States or Tennessee. Furthermore, in reviewing rules in the process of promulgation, the attorney general and reporter shall not approve rules that would effect an unconstitutional taking.

Acts 1994, ch. 924, § 4.

12-1-204. Effect of taking on property valuation.

If a court determines that a government action has resulted in an unconstitutional taking in Tennessee, the effect on the valuation of such property shall be taken into account in determining the value of the property for property tax purposes under title 67, chapter 5, part 6.

Acts 1994, ch. 924, § 5.

12-1-205. Attorneys' fees.

An owner of private property who successfully establishes that a government action is an unconstitutional taking of such owner's private property requiring payment or just compensation shall be entitled to recover the same attorneys' fees, costs and expenses as are allowable in actions brought pursuant to §29-16-123(b). Such recovery shall be in accordance with the procedures provided in such section.

Acts 1994, ch. 924, § 6.

12-1-206. Limitation of action.

An owner of private property shall commence any proceedings claiming a government action is an unconstitutional taking within the same limitation of actions period as provided in §29-16-124 for actions commenced pursuant to §29-16-123.

Acts 1994, ch. 924, § 7.